North Carolina, session 2025, HB654.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-19. Girl Scouts Week.
The Sunday through Saturday week of each year containing the twelfth day of March is
designated as Girl Scouts Week in North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H654-v-1*